Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2106
Authority; member or employee; interest in project or property; restriction; disclosure.

No member or employee of an authority shall voluntarily acquire any interest, direct or indirect, in any redevelopment project or in any property included or planned by the authority to be included in any such project, or in any contract or proposed contract in connection with any such project. Where the acquisition is not voluntary, such member or employee shall immediately disclose such interest in writing to the authority and such disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the authority. If any member or employee of an authority presently owns or controls or owned or controlled within the preceding two years an interest, direct or indirect, in any property included or planned by the authority to be included in any redevelopment project, he immediately shall disclose such interest in writing to the authority and such disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the authority. Upon such disclosure such member or employee of an authority shall not participate in any action by the authority affecting such property.

Laws 1951, c. 224, § 4(3), p. 801;

R.R.S.1943, § 14-1606;

R.R.S.1943, § 19-2606.